tables/no-no-g3.ctb
always til\sog\smed 2345-14-146
word tilfeldigvis 2345-124-1236
contraction tfv
begword tileg 2345-24-123-15-1245 # exception
begword tr 26

begword vanskeleg 1236-14-25-1245
begword vanskelig 1236-14-25-123

word vedtatt 1236-2345-2345							# level 3 contractions
word verken 1236-13

# Some exceptions

midendword ingskapsel 25-24-234-13-1-1234-234-15-123 # exception
midendword ngskapsel 1345-1245-234-13-1-1234-234-15-123 # exception
midendword ingskapsl 25-24-234-13-1-1234-234-123 # exception
midendword ngskapsl 1345-1245-234-13-1-1234-234-123 # exception

# We must cansel one pass2 rule in no-no-g0.utb
noback pass3 @3456-6-3456 @3456-3456

# Change order of letsign/capsign
noback pass2 @6-56-1256 @56-6-1256
nofor  pass2 @56-6-1256 @6-56-1256

# --------------------- End level 3 contracions ---------------------------
